District of Columbia statutes.
9-919

Annual audit.

The Authority shall prepare financial statements at the end of each of its fiscal years in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles. These financial statement [sic] shall be examined annually by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. Copies of each audit report shall be furnished to the Governor of the Commonwealth of Virginia and to the Mayor of the District not later than 120 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Authority and shall be open to public inspection.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 20, 32 DCR 6093
1981 Ed., § 7-1269.